Montana, session 2025, SB310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 23-2-109, MCA, is amended to read:
"23-2-109. Trails and recreational facilities grant program -- rulemaking. (1) There is a trails and
recreational facilities grant program administered by the department. The grant is called the trail stewardship
grant program.
(2) Cities, counties, tribal governments, school districts, recreational clubs and organizations, and
state and federal agencies are eligible to receive grant funds for the following projects:
(a) new trail and shared-use path construction;
(b) rehabilitation and maintenance of existing trails and shared-use paths; and
(c) trailside and trailhead facilities, including but not limited to bridges, fencing, parking, bathrooms,
latrines, picnic shelters, interpretation, trail signs, and trailside weed management. ;
(d) trail-related projects, economic impact studies, and feasibility and planning studies, including
safety and ethics education;
(e) trail data and conditions collection for safety and planning; and
(f) equipment purchases and maintenance.
(3) (a) The department shall award the following percentages of available trail stewardship grant
program funds:
(i) 40% to motorized projects;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 310
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 310
(ii) 40% to nonmotorized projects; and
(iii) 20% to projects that serve both motorized and nonmotorized uses.
(b) The balance of unused funds for an apportionment in subsection (3)(a) may be used to fund
projects for another apportionment in subsection (3)(a).
(c) An advance of up to 75% may be requested and provided at the time the grant is awarded for
needed expenses, and a further 25% when the first advance is spent and reported.
(3)(4) In making grants, the department shall consider the recommendations of the state trails
advisory committee established pursuant to 23 U.S.C. 206.
(4)(5) Entities receiving a grant may use up to 7% of the funds for administrative costs.
(5)(6) Any funds awarded pursuant to this section that are not fully expended within 3 years must
revert to the department and be deposited in the account established in 23-1-105.
(6)(7) The department may adopt rules to implement this section."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 310
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 310, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 310
INTRODUCED BY B. USHER, W. GALT, J. FULLER, S. GIST, D. LOGE, G. OBLANDER, E. BOLDMAN, G.
HERTZ, D. LENZ, B. MITCHELL, B. BEARD
AN ACT REVISING THE TRAILS AND RECREATIONAL FACILITIES GRANT PROGRAM; ESTABLISHING
THE TRAIL STEWARDSHIP GRANT PROGRAM; SPECIFYING APPORTIONMENT OF GRANT FUNDING;
EXPANDING PROJECTS AVAILABLE TO RECEIVE FUNDING; ALLOWING FOR ADVANCE PAYMENT OF
GRANT FUNDING; AMENDING SECTION 23-2-109, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.